California, session 20252026, AB1425.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 2770.2 is added to the Public Resources Code, to read:2770.2. (a) A person shall not conduct pit dewatering in areas with subsurface river flow or groundwater levels shallower than 50 feet below ground anywhere within the San Joaquin River Parkway, as defined in the “San Joaquin River Parkway Master Plan Update” from March 2018.(b) For purposes of this section, “pit dewatering” means any water that is impounded or that collects in the pit and is pumped, drained, or otherwise removed from the pit through the efforts of the pit operator. This term also includes wet pit overflows caused by solely by direct rainfall or ground water seepage.SEC. 2. The Legislature finds and declares that a special statute is necessary and that a general statute cannot be made applicable within the meaning of Section 16 of Article IV of the California Constitution because of the unique needs of the communities within and surrounding the San Joaquin River Parkway.SECTION 1.Section 2206 of the Public Resources Code is amended to read:2206.The State Geologist may prepare a special collection of ores and minerals of California to be sent to or used at any world’s fair or exposition in order to display the mineral wealth of the State of California.